Missouri, session 2026, SB1318.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 196.015, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 196.015,
to read as follows:
196.015. The following acts and the causing thereof
within the state of Missouri are hereby prohibited:
(1) The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding or
offering for sale of any food, drug, device, or cosmetic
that is adulterated or misbranded;
(2) The adulteration or misbranding of any food, drug,
device, or cosmetic;
(3) The receipt in commerce of any food, drug, device,
or cosmetic that is adulterated or misbranded, and the
delivery or proffered delivery thereof for pay or otherwise;
(4) The sale, delivery for sale, holding for sale, or
offering for sale of any article in violation of section
196.080 or 196.105;
(5) The dissemination of any false advertisement;
(6) The refusal to permit entry or inspection, or to
permit the taking of a sample, as authorized by section
196.055;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1318 2
(7) The giving of a guaranty or undertaking referred
to in subsection 2 of section [196.025(2)] 196.025, which
guaranty or undertaking is false; except by a person who
relied on a guaranty or undertaking to the same effect
signed by, and containing the name and address of the person
residing in the state of Missouri or in the United States,
from whom he received in good faith the food, drug, device,
or cosmetic;
(8) The removal or disposal of a detained or embargoed
article in violation of section 196.030;
(9) The alteration, mutilation, destruction,
obliteration, or removal of the whole or any part of the
labeling of, or the doing of any other act with respect to a
food, drug, device, or cosmetic, if such act is done while
such article is held for sale and results in such article
being misbranded;
(10) Forging, counterfeiting, simulating, or falsely
representing, or without proper authority using any mark,
stamp, tag, label, or other identification device authorized
or required by regulations promulgated under the provisions
of sections 196.010 to 196.120;
(11) The using, on the labeling of any drug or in any
advertising relating to such drug, of any representation or
suggestion that an application with respect to such drug is
effective under section 196.105, or that such drug complies
with the provisions of such section;
(12) The using by any person to his own advantage, or
revealing, other than to the department, or to the courts
when relevant in any judicial proceeding under sections
196.010 to 196.120, any information acquired under authority
of sections 196.055, 196.080, or 196.105 concerning any

SB 1318 3
method or process which as a trade secret is entitled to
protection; and
(13) The sale or offering for sale of cell-cultured
protein for human consumption, or any product containing
such, within this state. "Cell-cultured protein" shall
include any food product derived from harvesting animal
cells and artificially replicating those cells in a growth
medium to produce tissue.
✓